test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PFV-sii-nagudiitlod_jump-down_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - nàgudiitłod[jump-down] :
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg1:       [nàgudastłòt, nàgudìsistłòt]
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg2:       nàgudìsíítłòt
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg3:       nàgudìstłòt
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1:       [nàgudìsiìtłòt, nàgudìsaàtłòt]
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [nàdàgudìsiìtłòt, nàdàgudìsaàtłòt]
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2:       nàgudìsastłòt
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2+Distr: nàdàgudìsastłòt
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3:       nàgugidìstłòt
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3+Distr: nàdàgugidìstłòt
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4:       nàguts'idìstłòt
    nàgudiitłod+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4+Distr: nàdàguts'idìstłòt
